California statutes. Education Code
 and produce an increased fund of economically reproducible instructional resources to accelerate large-scale conversion of schools in other school districts of the state.

(e) Provide a careful evaluation of the effectiveness of individualized instruction and the problems of conversion, including teacher training, curriculum design and production, integration of vocational education with the regular coursework, and plant utilization. Such an evaluation will help other school districts avoid pitfalls and unnecessary expenditures and permit their programs of individualized instruction to be developed with maximum efficiency and effectiveness. 

(f) Provide a major opportunity to design and test the criteria and tools for measuring educational performance. Such an opportunity shall contribute essential information and experience to efforts to set goals and measure performance in all
 the schools of this state.

(g) Provide the Governor and the Legislature with more precise information on the fiscal requirements for converting schools in this state to programs of individualized instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58401.

As used in this chapter “individualized instruction based upon performance criteria” means an educational method in which (a) aptitudes, interests, motivations, and other characteristics of each student play a major role in the selection of educational objectives and the determination of the sequence of study and choice of materials and procedures; (b) the time spent by each student in a given subject area is determined by his performance; and (c) the progress of each student is measured by comparing his performance with a specific objective, rather than with the performance of other students.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58402.

The Legislature further finds and declares that funds are needed to convert the regular curriculum to individualized instruction and integration of vocational education and that once such conversion and integration have been accomplished, such program shall operate on the funds regularly available to the school districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58403.

The State Board of Education shall establish application procedures and select a school district to undertake an individualized instruction program pursuant to this chapter. The specific goal of the individualized instruction program authorized by this article shall be to convert at least one high school and the network of elementary and junior high schools which provide students to that high school to a program of individualized instruction based upon performance criteria, including the full integration of vocational education with the regular coursework, and to articulate this program with a community college. In authorizing this program, the Legislature recognizes that
 conversion of the entire network of schools may require incremental development beginning, for example, with a high school, one junior high school, and one elementary school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58404.

In selecting a school district to undertake an individualized instruction program pursuant to this chapter, the board shall use the following criteria:

(a) The school district shall be a large urban unified district, which had an average daily attendance of not less than 30,000 for the school year 1967–1968, and which has an agreement with a community college to articulate their curricula.

(b) The high school and network of junior high and elementary schools shall be representative of the range of socioeconomic-educational problems faced by urban
 schools.

(c) The local board of education and administrators of the school district and the administrators and teachers of the schools to be involved shall be strongly committed to the goals of the individualized instruction program.

(d) The individualized instruction program shall be carried out with maximum participation of the teachers and administrators of the individual schools and with substantial flexibility for each school to establish its own program within the framework of general goals and requirements for the overall program within the school district.

(e) The school district shall have a plan for community involvement with the program, including students, parents, and representatives of business, industry, organized labor, community and civic organizations, and the general public.

(f) The cost experience of the individualized instruction program and the instructional technology used in the school district shall be readily transferable to other schools in the state.

(g) The schools selected by the district to participate in the program shall receive entitlement equivalent to the total amount of resources from state, local and federal funds which would otherwise be provided the schools under the district’s current budgeting procedures.

(h) The instructional program shall include the full integration of vocational education with the regular curriculum and shall acquaint students in all grades with career alternatives and the relevancy of the school curricula to achieving career objectives.

(i) The school district shall have a written
 statement adopted by the local board of education setting forth the goals, and to the extent feasible, the measurable objectives of education in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58405.

In selecting the school district to undertake the individualized instruction program pursuant to this chapter, the State Board of Education shall conduct a thorough field review in order to make independent judgments of the suitability of a district to participate in the program. The field review shall include a rating of the levels of commitment of the teachers and administrators to the individualized instruction program set forth in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58406.

The district selected to undertake the program authorized by this chapter shall have complete responsibility for the program’s progress and success. The staff of the Department of Education shall serve as a resource team that shall provide technical assistance and advice to the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58407.

The state board may waive any provision of this code, with the exception of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16500), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 39140) of Chapter 2 of Part 23, which it deems is necessary to waive to assure the success of the program authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

58409.

District evaluation and reporting requirements required by this article shall not supersede other legal requirements.

It is the intent of the Legislature, however, that the State Board of Education and the Department of Education make every effort to use the evaluation and reporting requirements under this chapter in fulfilling any other legal requirements in order to minimize the administrative burdens on the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Alternative Schools [58500. - 58512.]

58500.

The governing board of any school district may establish and maintain one or more alternative schools within the district.

For the purposes of this article, an alternative school is defined as a school or separate class group within a school which is operated in a manner designed to:

(a) Maximize the opportunity for students to develop the positive values of self-reliance, initiative, kindness, spontaneity, resourcefulness, courage, creativity, responsibility, and joy.

(b) Recognize that the best learning takes place when the student learns because of his desire to learn.

(c) Maintain a learning situation maximizing student self-motivation and encouraging the student in his own time to follow his own interests. These interests may be conceived by him totally and independently or may result in whole or in part from a presentation by his teachers of choices of learning projects.

(d) Maximize the opportunity for teachers, parents and students to cooperatively develop the learning process and its subject matter. This opportunity shall be a continuous, permanent process.

(e) Maximize the opportunity for the students, teachers, and parents to continuously react to the changing world, including but not limited to the community in which the school is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58501.

The following notice shall be sent along with the notification of parents and guardians required by Section 48980:
“Notice of Alternative Schools

California state law authorizes all school districts to provide for alternative schools. Section 58500 of the Education Code defines alternative school as a school or separate class group within a school which is operated in a manner designed to:

(a) Maximize the opportunity for students to develop the positive values of self-reliance, initiative, kindness, spontaneity, resourcefulness, courage, creativity, responsibility, and joy.

(b) Recognize that the best learning takes place when the student learns because of his desire to learn.

(c) Maintain a learning situation maximizing student self-motivation and encouraging the student in his own time to follow his own interests. These interests may be conceived by him totally and independently or may result in whole or in part from a presentation by his teachers of choices of learning projects.

(d) Maximize the opportunity for teachers, parents and students to cooperatively develop the learning process and its subject matter. This opportunity shall be a continuous, permanent process.

(e) Maximize the opportunity for the students, teachers, and parents to continuously react to the changing world, including but not limited to the community in which the school is located.

In the event any parent, pupil, or teacher is interested in further information concerning alternative schools, the county superintendent of schools, the administrative office of this district, and the principal’s office in each attendance unit have copies of the law available for your information. This law particularly authorizes interested persons to request the governing board of the district to establish alternative school programs in each district.”

Further, a copy shall be posted in at least two places normally visible to pupils, teachers, and visiting parents in each attendance unit for the entire month of March in each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 469, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58502.

The parent or guardian of any pupil may request the governing board of a school district to establish an alternative school program or programs in the district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.

Teachers employed and students enrolled in the alternative school shall be selected entirely from volunteers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58504.

Previous classroom performance shall not be a criterion limiting any student from the opportunity of attending an alternative school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58505.

A district may establish alternative schools in each attendance area or on a districtwide basis, with enrollment open to all students districtwide, or any combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

58507.

Alternative schools shall be operated in a manner to maximize the opportunity for improvement of the general school curriculum by innovative methods and ideas developed within the alternative school operation and to improve the general level of education in the State of California as provided in Section 58510.

Any alternative school shall be maintained and funded by the school district at the same level of support as other educational programs for children of the same age level operated by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58509.

For the operation of alternative schools as herein defined, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon application of a school district, waive any provisions of this code other than those relating to earthquake safety and the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

58510.

Each district operating an alternative school shall annually evaluate such school. The evaluation shall include testing of basic skills for student participants, and must identify the variables which may have affected student academic achievement. The process of evaluation shall also include teacher, parent, and student input from the alternative school itself. These evaluation reports shall be sent to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on or before August 1st of the following year and shall be annually reviewed by persons designated by the superintendent who are not employed by the district operating the alternative school under review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

58511.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish minimum standards to further implement the definition of alternative schools as used in Section 58500 and may also establish such further guidelines as may be deemed by him necessary to the proper administration of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

58512.

The governing board of a school district maintaining an alternative school may provide in whole or in part for the transportation of a pupil attending the alternative school. In lieu of providing such transportation, the governing board may pay to the parents or guardian of the pupil a sum not to exceed the cost of actual and necessary travel incurred in transporting such pupils in cases where transportation is provided by or paid for by the parents or guardian; provided, that in no case shall the district’s state apportionment for transportation expenses be increased because of the operation of an alternative school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Specialized Secondary Programs [58800. - 58806.]

58800.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to assist in the establishment of specialized high schools in the state to provide advanced instruction and training in high technology fields and in the performing arts.

The Legislature recognizes that the establishment of these specialized high schools will benefit the state economy by providing opportunities to talented pupils to obtain enhanced learning opportunities in high technology fields and in the performing arts while enrolled in schools located in school districts in close proximity to areas in which these industries are located.

The Legislature also recognizes that the high technology specialized high schools established under this chapter will enable the faculty providing instruction in these schools to develop model curricula of general application in the fields of mathematics, science, performing arts, and computer technology to be made available to other school districts in the public school system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58801.

Any school district operating one or more high schools, or any consortium of school districts that operate one or more high schools, or any county superintendent of schools, or any county board of education, may submit a proposal to the Superintendent of Public Instruction to establish a school or schools with specialized curricula in high technology, performing arts, or other special curricular areas, for pupils in grades 9 through 12. School districts that submit proposals as a consortium shall agree to accept pupils from each district in the consortium at the specialized school.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, commencing with the 1984–85 fiscal year, allocate funds for startup costs of these specialized secondary schools or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

58801.5.

Entities eligible for funding of startup costs pursuant to Section 58801 shall be eligible to compete for funding for startup costs regardless of funding in any prior year. Receipt of funds for additional startup costs shall be based upon the addition of new program offerings. Funds provided pursuant to this section shall supplement, and shall not supplant, funds provided pursuant to Section 58801.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58801.6.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion funds as available from the annual Budget Act for support of specialized secondary programs established prior to the 1991–92 fiscal year that operate in conjunction with the California State University. Funds apportioned pursuant to this section shall be distributed equally among eligible specialized secondary schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

58802.

Faculty members providing instruction in specialized secondary programs shall develop model curricula which the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make available to other school districts in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

58803.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, specialized secondary programs may select as teachers noncredentialed persons who possess unique talents or skills from business, performing arts, or postsecondary institutions. No noncredentialed person shall be retained as a teacher in a specialized secondary program unless, within 60 days after the governing board has hired such a person, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing has issued a certificate of clearance for him or her, which the commission shall issue when it has verified the person’s personal identification and good moral character.

Each school district governing board that employs noncredentialed persons to teach in specialized secondary programs shall annually report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the number of those persons employed, the subjects they are employed to teach, and the unique talents and skills they possess.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 112.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

58804.

From the funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of Section 42238, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make allocations for the purposes of this chapter to county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education, operating approved specialized secondary schools, as follows:

(a) For the 1985–86 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, in lieu of the funding calculation set forth in Section 42238, the revenue limit for each county superintendent of schools, or county board of education, operating one or more specialized secondary schools shall be calculated by multiplying the average daily attendance for the school or schools by the statewide average base revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance, for high school districts, as computed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.

(b) The school district of residence of any pupil enrolled in a specialized secondary school operated by a county superintendent of schools or county board of education shall not include the attendance of that pupil in any computation of average daily attendance for purposes of Section 42238.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 831, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

58804.2.

Commencing with the 1992–93 academic year, each specialized secondary school operated pursuant to Section 58801.6 shall annually evaluate the success of its program as follows:

(a) The program shall be deemed successful if it meets all of the following:

(1) Eighty percent of the pupils participating in the program pursue either postsecondary education or additional professional training in their chosen fields of study after graduation from high school.

(2) Eighty percent of the pupils that remain in the program complete their high school education.

(b) The program shall also be evaluated based on an assessment of other factors including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Increased pupil, parent, community, professional and business community, and school employee satisfaction with pupil learning, school organization, and school governance and management.

(2) Counseling and other support services that enhance the program and the success of the pupils.

(3) Improvement in the academic performance of pupils as measured by grade point average or other appropriate standards of achievement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 32.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

58805.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may enter into an interagency agreement with a consortium of two or more school districts to establish an academy of visual and performing arts to operate specialized secondary school programs in visual and performing arts that are conducted outside the regular schoolday, subject to this chapter.

(b) The governing boards of any two or more school districts or county offices of education may enter into the consortium described in subdivision (a). The academy established by this section shall be governed, subject to the interagency agreement provided for by subdivision (a), by a five-member governing board which shall be made up of 3 members representing the consortium who shall be superintendents or their designees of school districts or county offices of education with the largest student participation; and two members appointed by the Foundation for the Academy of Performing and Visual Arts. The authority of the board to operate the academy shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The appointment of a director to develop and administer the academy and the specialized secondary school programs operated by the academy.

(2) The execution of an agreement with any urban campus of a college or university with a means for assisting in the development of similar programs at other campuses or universities on a statewide basis, for the use of the educational resources of that campus for the purposes of this section.

(3) Responsibility over the fiscal accountability of the academy.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 46300, the off-campus participation, by a pupil in any of the grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in any program of visual or performing arts operated under this section may be authorized as an independent study program in accordance with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28. In no event shall a pupil concurrently enrolled in an independent study program and in a regular comprehensive high school or junior high school generate, for the purposes of Section 46300, more than one unit of average daily attendance per school year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1315, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58806.

A specialized secondary school operated by a county superintendent of schools under this chapter shall be considered a school district by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of receiving funds pursuant to Sections 42239 and 42239.5 of the Education Code. If a specialized secondary school counts a pupil in its summer school enrollment, the school shall notify the pupil’s school district of original attendance, and that school district shall not count that pupil in its summer school enrollment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 32. STATE SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND CENTERS [59000. - 59300.]



  CHAPTER 1. California Schools for the Deaf [59000. - 59054.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [59000. - 59009.]

59000.

There are two state schools for the deaf, known and designated as the California School for the Deaf, Northern California, and the California School for the Deaf, Southern California. The term “California School for the Deaf” shall refer to both schools unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59001.

The California School for the Deaf is part of the public school system of the state except that it derives no revenue from the State School Fund, and has for its object the education of the deaf who, because of their severe hearing loss and educational needs, cannot be provided an appropriate educational program and related services in the regular public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1247.)
-------------------------------------------

59001.2.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is essential for the well-being and growth of deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils that educational programs recognize the unique nature of deafness and ensure that all deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils have appropriate, ongoing, and fully accessible educational opportunities.

(b) It is essential that a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil obtain an education in which special education teachers, psychologists, speech therapists, assessors, administrators, and other school and residential program personnel understand the unique nature of deafness and are trained to work with a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil.

(c) It is essential that a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil obtain an education in which his or her special education teachers are proficient in the primary language mode of that pupil.

(d) It is essential that a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil obtain an education in which his or her parents are involved in determining the extent, content, and purpose of programs.

(e) It is essential that a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil, like all pupils, have programs in which his or her unique vocational needs are provided for, including appropriate research, curricula, programs, staff, and outreach.

(f) Each deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil should receive an education that allows him or her to master a primary language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

59001.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that programs at the California School for the Deaf provide all of the following:

(a) Each pupil should be assured an education appropriate to his or her needs in publicly supported programs through completion of his or her prescribed course of study or until the time that he or she has met proficiency standards.

(b) Each pupil should have his or her educational goals, objectives, special education, and related services specified in a written individualized education program.

(c) Procedures and materials for assessment and placement of individuals with exceptional needs should be selected and administered so as not to be racially, culturally, or sexually discriminatory. No single assessment instrument should be the sole criterion for determining placement of a pupil. The procedures and materials for assessment and placement should be in the individual’s mode of communication. All assessment materials and procedures should be selected and administered pursuant to Section 56320.

(d) Psychological and health services for individuals with exceptional needs should be available to each schoolsite.

(e) Continuous evaluation of the effectiveness of these education programs should be made to ensure the highest quality educational offerings.

(f) Appropriate qualified staff should be employed, consistent with credentialing requirements, to fulfill the educational responsibilities, and positive efforts are made to employ qualified deaf and hard-of-hearing individuals.

(g) Educational and residential program personnel should be adequately prepared to provide educational instruction and services to individuals with exceptional needs in the appropriate communication mode, including American Sign Language.

(h) There should be appropriate access to information and training in American Sign Language for parents and pupils to ensure that they are able to appropriately communicate with their families.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

59002.

The California Schools for the Deaf are under the administration of the State Department of Education.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in connection with the California Schools for the Deaf, shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide educational assessments and individual educational recommendations for individuals who are referred for those services pursuant to Section 56326.

(b) Maintain a comprehensive elementary educational program, including related services, for deaf individuals.

(c) Serve as a regional secondary educational program providing a comprehensive secondary education, including a full-range academic curriculum, appropriate prevocational and vocational preparation opportunities, and nonacademic and extracurricular activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 50.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59002.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in connection with the California Schools for the Deaf and in cooperation with public and private agencies, may do one or more of the following:

(a) Serve as a demonstration school to promote personnel development through student teaching, in-service education, internships, professional observations for special education and related services personnel in cooperation with institutions of higher education and local education agencies.

(b) Serve as a resource center to develop and disseminate special curriculum, media teaching methods, and instructional materials adapted for deaf individuals, achievement tests and other assessment methods useful to the instruction of deaf individuals.

(c) Provide counseling and information services for parents, guardians, and families of deaf individuals, and public information about deafness to community groups and other agencies.

(d) Conduct experimental programs and projects to promote improvement in special education for deaf individuals.

(e) Promote and coordinate community and continuing education opportunities for deaf individuals utilizing existing community resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 51.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59003.

The State Department of Education in relation to the California Schools for the Deaf shall:

(a) Prescribe rules for the government of the schools.

(b) Appoint the superintendents and other officers and employees.

(c) Remove for cause any officer, teacher, or employee.

(d) Fix the compensation of officers, teachers, and employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 51.5.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59004.

The superintendent of the school shall have had not less than three years’ experience in the art of teaching the deaf and shall hold a credential issued by the State Board of Education authorizing him to teach in secondary schools of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59005.

The powers and duties of the superintendents of the schools are such as are assigned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 51.7.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59006.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize the California Schools for the Deaf to establish and maintain teacher training courses designed to prepare teachers of the public schools and such other persons holding a credential issued by the State Board of Education as are recommended by the president of a campus of the California State University, to give instruction to the deaf and the hard of hearing. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prescribe standards for the admission of persons to the courses, and for the content of the courses.

The California Schools for the Deaf may enter into agreements with the Trustees of the California State University, the University of California, or any other university or college accredited by the State Board of Education as a teacher training educational institution, to provide practice teaching required for issuance of the credential authorizing the holder to teach the deaf and severely hard of hearing. The agreement may provide a reasonable payment, for services rendered, to teachers of the California Schools for the Deaf who have practice teachers under their direction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 52.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59007.

The State Department of Education may employ any person, otherwise qualified, who has retired for service under either the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System as a substitute in a position requiring certification qualifications at the California Schools for the Deaf, except that the total of that service and any service rendered pursuant to Section 23919 shall not exceed 90 teaching days in any one fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 52.5.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59008.

(a) The Department of Human Resources shall consider making salaries for teachers, specialists, and administrators of the California School for the Deaf competitive with the salaries of similarly qualified school teachers, specialists, and administrators who are employed by the encompassing school districts.

(b) For purposes of this section, “teachers,” “teacher specialists,” and “administrators” mean those individuals who hold the appropriate teaching, service, or teaching and administrative credential, as appropriate, as issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, as determined by the employing state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 10.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

59009.

(a) The department may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors for the California School for the Deaf, as defined in Section 59000, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The department shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 23.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Pupils [59020. - 59031.]

59020.

Every deaf person between the ages of 3 and 21 years, who is a resident of the state and who meets the criteria set forth in this section, is entitled to an education in the California School for the Deaf free of charge.

Priority in admission to the California School for the Deaf shall be given to elementary age deaf minors residing in sparsely populated regions and to secondary age deaf minors in need of a high school program, for whom appropriate comprehensive educational facilities and services are not available or cannot be reasonably provided by their local school districts or county educational agencies. 

The criteria of admission to California Schools for the Deaf and Blind shall be administratively determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59023.

If the parent or guardian of any pupil in the school is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to clothe the child, or pay for its transportation to and from school, or for necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization of the child while at the school, or is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing dental work, eye care, operations, or hospitalization for the child in an emergency, the parent or guardian may apply for a certificate to that effect to the superior court of the county of which the parent or guardian of the child is a resident. If the court is satisfied that the parent or guardian either himself or from the estate of the child is unable to pay for any such service, it shall issue a certificate to that effect. The application for the certificate may also be made to the court by the superintendent of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59024.

If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the parent or guardian has sufficient pecuniary ability or that there are sufficient funds in the estate of the child to provide the service for the child or to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing the service for the child in an emergency, the court shall not issue the certificate, but shall, according to the nature of the application before it, either order the superintendent to provide the child with the service or order the parent or guardian either himself or from the estate of the child, as the court determines, to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing the service for the child in an emergency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59025.

If the Department of Education is not reimbursed by the parent or guardian personally or from the estate of the child for expenditures made by the superintendent under the order of the court or if the parent or guardian does not comply with an order of the court to reimburse the Department of Education either personally or from the estate of the child for expenses incurred by it in providing the service for the child in an emergency, the superintendent may sue the parent or guardian, in the name of the state, to recover any money paid out by order of the court or due the Department of Education as reimbursement under an order of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59026.
